Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Part D. Registration and Modification of Foreign Child Support Order

407.5616.
Procedure to register child support order of foreign country for modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a foreign child support order not under the Convention may register that order in this state under KRS

407.5601

,

407.5602

,

407.5603

,

407.5604

,

407.5605

,

407.5606

,

407.5607

, and

407.5608

if the order has not been registered. A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration, or at another time. The petition shall specify the grounds for modification.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 18, § 54, effective June 24, 2015.